test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kolmmsab_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kõlmmsab e-stem kylmempi: # Noun - full paradigm
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Indef: kõlmmsab
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Indef: kõlmmsab
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Indef: kõlmmsab
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Sg+Ill+Indef: kõlmmsuʹbbe
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Sg+Loc+Indef: kõlmmsubust
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Sg+Com+Indef: kõlmmsubuin
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Ess+Indef: kõlmmsuben
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Par+Indef: kõlmmsubed
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kõlmmsabtaa, kõlmmsabtää]
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Pl+Nom+Indef: kõlmmsab
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Pl+Gen+Indef: kõlmmsabi
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Pl+Acc+Indef: kõlmmsabid
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Pl+Ill+Indef: kõlmmsabid
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Pl+Loc+Indef: kõlmmsubuin
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Pl+Com+Indef: kõlmmsabivuiʹm
     kõlmmsab+A+Comp+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kõlmmsabitaa, kõlmmsabitää]
